Missouri, session 2026, HB3427.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 431, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 431.203, to read as follows:
431.203. 1. For purposes of this section, "covenant not to compete" means an
agreement, understanding, contract, or contractual term in which an employee or
prospective employee agrees not to compete against an employer or prospective
employer or agrees not to accept any positions with a competitor of an employer or
prospective employer following the termination of a business or employment
relationship between the employee or prospective employee and the employer or
prospective employer. A covenant not to compete may, but need not, contain time-based
or geographic limitations.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of section 431.202 or any other provision of
law to the contrary, a covenant not to compete shall be void and unenforceable to the
extent that it applies to an employment arrangement wherein an employee is or would
be paid hourly wages.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.